Utah statutes.
4-5-19.   Publication of reports and information.
(1)  The department shall publish reports summarizing all judgments, decrees,
and court orders which have been rendered under this chapter, including the
nature of the charge and its disposition.
(2)  The department shall  disseminate information regarding food which it
considers necessary in the interest of public health and for the protection of
consumers against fraud. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prohibit the department from collecting, reporting, and illustrating the
results of investigations made by it.
